Utah statutes.
58-55-310.   Requirements when working for political subdivision or state agency.

Each political subdivision and agency of the state and each board of education which requires the issuance of a permit or license as a precondition to the construction, alteration, improvement, demolition, or other repairs for which a contractor's license is also required under this chapter shall:

(1)  require that each applicant for a permit or license file a signed statement that the applicant has a current contractor's license with the license number included in the application;

(2)  require that any representation of exemption from the contractor's licensing law be included in the signed statement and that if that exempt person, firm, corporation, association, or other organization intends to hire a contractor to perform any work under the permit or license, that the license number of that contractor be included in the application, but if a contractor has not been selected at the time of the application for a permit or license, the permit or license shall be issued only on the condition that a currently licensed contractor will be selected and that the license number of the contractor will be given to the issuing public body and displayed on the permit or license;

(3)  require that, upon issuance of a permit or license, the contractor affix the contractor's license number to that permit or license for public display; and

(4)  require the contractor to provide proof that the contractor provides workers' compensation insurance, pays into the unemployment insurance fund, provides health insurance as required under federal or state law, and withholds applicable taxes from worker pay.



Amended by Chapter 57, 2013 General Session

